Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.202

Application of administrative procedure act.

The proceedings for denying license applications, issuing cease and desist orders, suspending or revoking licenses, and imposing civil penalties or other remedies under this chapter, and any review or appeal of such action, shall be governed by the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2001 c 81 s 15.]